Utah statutes.
78B-7-110.   No denial of relief solely because of lapse of time.

The court may not deny a petitioner relief requested pursuant to this chapter solely because of a lapse of time between an act of domestic violence or abuse and the filing of the petition for an order of protection.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

